Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1505
Commission; organization; compensation of members.

The commission shall designate a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and such other officers as it may desire and may, from time to time, change such designation. A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum, and the concurrence of a majority in any matter within their duties shall be required for its determination. Each of the members of the commission shall receive a per diem of fifty dollars per day for each day in the performance of his or her duties on the commission, but no member shall receive more than two thousand dollars in any one year, and in addition shall be entitled to expenses, including traveling expenses, necessarily incurred in the discharge of his or her duties on the commission, as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1937, c. 8, § 4, p. 95;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-1904;

R.S.1943, § 2-1505;

Laws 1957, c. 3, § 3, p. 84;

Laws 1961, c. 4, § 3, p. 68;

Laws 1972, LB 542, § 3;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 2;

Laws 1980, LB 701, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 23.